Ohio, session 136, HB878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 6111.09 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 6111.09. (A) Any (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, any person who violates section 6111.07 of the Revised Code shall pay a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per day of violation. Any (2) Any person who violates section 6111.07 of the Revised Code when the underlying offense is a violation of division (B) of section 6111.33 of the Revised Code shall pay a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for a first violation and a civil penalty of not more than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation. (3) Any person who purposely violates section 6111.10 or 6111.11 of the Revised Code shall pay a civil penalty of fifty dollars for a first violation and a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation occurring within twelve months of the first violation. (4) The attorney general, upon written request by the director of environmental protection, shall commence an action under this section against any person who violates section 6111.07 of the Revised Code. The director shall notify in writing any person who is allegedly selling or offering for sale a product in violation of section 6111.10 or 6111.11 of the Revised Code of the alleged specific violation and shall request the person to remove the product from the person's sales area. If at least ten days after providing that notification the director determines that the person has failed to remove the product from the person's sales area, the director in writing shall request the attorney general to, and the attorney general shall, commence an action under this section against the person. Any action under this section is a civil action, governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure and other rules of practice and procedure applicable to civil actions. (B) One-half of the moneys collected as civil penalties under division (A) of this section shall be credited to the environmental education fund created in section 3745.22 of the Revised Code. The remainder of the moneys so collected shall be credited to the water pollution control administration fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The water pollution control administration fund shall be administered by the director. Moneys in the water pollution control administration fund shall be used to supplement other moneys available for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and the rules adopted and terms and conditions of orders and permits issued under it, including, without limitation, the issuance of permits under it, and shall not be used to satisfy any state matching fund requirements for the receipt of any federal grant funds. The director may expend not more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of the moneys credited to the water pollution control administration fund under this division in any fiscal year for the purposes specified in this division. The director may request authority from the controlling board to expend any moneys credited to that fund in any fiscal year in excess of that amount. Section 2. That existing section 6111.09 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.